lexd_components/hyw-names.lexd
LEXICON NameMaleGiven
Ադրիկ:Ադրիկ
Աթանիա:Աթանիա
Ալան:Ալան
Ակնէ:Ակնէ
Աշնակ:Աշնակ
Ասպօ:Ասպօ
Ասօ:Ասօ
Արեգ:Արեգ
Արեւ:Արեւ
Արեւիկ:Արեւիկ
Արին:Արին
Արծիւ:Արծիւ
Արման:Արման
Արմիկ:Արմիկ
Արշալ:Արշալ
Արշալոյս:Արշալոյս
Արշօ:Արշօ
Արտեմ:Արտեմ
Արտոյտ:Արտոյտ
Բաթիկ:Բաթիկ
Բալաս:Բալաս
Բալիկ:Բալիկ
Բախտիկ:Բախտիկ
Բիւրակ:Բիւրակ
Գարիկ:Գարիկ
Դուին:Դուին
Եղիա:Եղիա
Եղվարդ:Եղվարդ
Երեւակ:Երեւակ
Երջանիկ:Երջանիկ
Զարման:Զարման
Զարմիկ:Զարմիկ
Զօրա:Զօրա
Զօրիկ:Զօրիկ
Ընծայ:Ընծայ
Թամիկ:Թամիկ
Թուխիկ:Թուխիկ
Լազուր:Լազուր
Լեռնիկ:Լեռնիկ
Լոյս:Լոյս
Համբարձում:Համբարձում
Հոգի:Հոգի
Հրաչիկ:Հրաչիկ
Մագի:Մագի
Մաղաք:Մաղաք
Մաղաքիա:Մաղաքիա
Մանէ:Մանէ
Մանիկ:Մանիկ
Մարուս:Մարուս
Մեխակ:Մեխակ
Մեղրիկ:Մեղրիկ
Յոյս:Յոյս
Նաթան:Նաթան
Նայիրի:Նայիրի
Նարին:Նարին
Նշան:Նշան
Նուբար:Նուբար
Նուպար:Նուպար
Շամիրամ:Շամիրամ
Շամօ:Շամօ
Շէկ:Շէկ
Ոսկի:Ոսկի
Ոստան:Ոստան
Պատւական:Պատւական
Պսակ:Պսակ
Ռենէ:Ռենէ
Սանոտ:Սանոտ
Սեւան:Սեւան
Սիսիան:Սիսիան
Սիւնիք:Սիւնիք
Սոխակ:Սոխակ
Սօս:Սօս
Վալերի:Վալերի
Վանան:Վանան
Վանէ:Վանէ
Վանի:Վանի
Վարդ:Վարդ
Վարդերես:Վարդերես
Վարդօ:Վարդօ
Վիկտոր:Վիկտոր
Փայլիկ:Փայլիկ
Փօլ:Փօլ
Օրի:Օրի
Վան:Վան
Մռաւ:Մռաւ
Մասիս:Մասիս
Եփրատ:Եփրատ
Հայասա:Հայասա
Ամարաս:Ամարաս
Տիգրիս:Տիգրիս
Հրազդան:Հրազդան
Սիս:Սիս
Հրազդան:Հրազդան
Կարին:Կարին
Արարատ:Արարատ
Արամօ:Արամօ
Աբգար:Աբգար
Աբեթ:Աբեթ
Յովսիա:Յովսիա
Աբել:Աբել
Աբիկ:Աբիկ
Աբով:Աբով
Աբրահամ:Աբրահամ
Աբրամ:Աբրամ
Միլտոն:Միլտոն #reassigned
Ադամ:Ադամ
Ադդէ:Ադդէ
Ադէ:Ադէ
Միթրոս:Միթրոս #reassigned
Ադիս:Ադիս
Ադոն:Ադոն
Ադրիաթիկ:Ադրիաթիկ
Ադրիան:Ադրիան
Ազատ:Ազատ
Ազարիա:Ազարիա
Ազարիկ:Ազարիկ
Լուդւիկ:Լուդւիկ
Ազնաւոր:Ազնաւոր
Ազնաւուր:Ազնաւուր
Ազնուր:Ազնուր
Ալբրիկ:Ալբրիկ
Ալեքսան:Ալեքսան
Ալեքսանդր:Ալեքսանդր
Ալեքսանիոս:Ալեքսանիոս
Ալէն:Ալէն
Ալէք:Ալէք
Ժաք:Ժաք
Ալէքս:Ալէքս
Ալւանդ:Ալւանդ
Ալֆրէդ:Ալֆրէդ
Ակնունի:Ակնունի
Ակոբ:Ակոբ
Ահարոն:Ահարոն
Աղան:Աղան
Աղասի:Աղասի
Աղեքսանդր:Աղեքսանդր
Ամատունի:Ամատունի
Ամբակ:Ամբակ
Ամբօ:Ամբօ
Ամիր:Ամիր
Ամոս:Ամոս
Ամովս:Ամովս
Ամուր:Ամուր
Ամրամ:Ամրամ
Ամրար:Ամրար
Ամրէ:Ամրէ
Այրուկ:Այրուկ
Այրօ:Այրօ
Այւազ:Այւազ
Անակ:Անակ
Անամայէլ:Անամայէլ
Անան:Անան
Անանէս:Անանէս
Անանի:Անանի
Անանիա:Անանիա
Անանիկ:Անանիկ
Անաստաս:Անաստաս
Անգէ:Անգէ
Անդիկ:Անդիկ
Անդոկ:Անդոկ
Անդրանիկ:Անդրանիկ
Անդրէ:Անդրէ
Անդրէա:Անդրէա
Անդրէաս:Անդրէաս
Անդրիաս:Անդրիաս
Անդրիկ:Անդրիկ
Անդրու:Անդրու
Անդրուշ:Անդրուշ
Անդօ:Անդօ
Անթուան:Անթուան
Անթօ:Անթօ
Անուշաւան:Անուշաւան
Անտոն:Անտոն
Աշոտ:Աշոտ
Ապով:Ապով
Առաքեալ:Առաքեալ
Առաքել:Առաքել
Առիւծ:Առիւծ
Առծիւ:Առծիւ
Առնակ:Առնակ
Առնէ:Առնէ
Առնոլդ:Առնոլդ
Առնօ:Առնօ
Առուշ:Առուշ
Ասատուր:Ասատուր
Ասծատուր:Ասծատուր
Ասպետ:Ասպետ
Աստիկ:Աստիկ
Աստւածատուր:Աստւածատուր
Ասքանազ:Ասքանազ
Ատոմ:Ատոմ
Արա:Արա
Արաբօ:Արաբօ
Արագած:Արագած
Արադա:Արադա
Արամ:Արամ
Արամազդ:Արամազդ
Արամայիս:Արամայիս
Արամանեակ:Արամանեակ
Արամէ:Արամէ
Արամիկ:Արամիկ
Արայիկ:Արայիկ
Արաստ:Արաստ
Արավան:Արավան
Արբակ:Արբակ
Արբի:Արբի
Արգամ:Արգամ
Արգին:Արգին
Արգիշտի:Արգիշտի
Արդին:Արդին
Արզան:Արզան
Արզուման:Արզուման
Արզօ:Արզօ
Արէն:Արէն
Արթի:Արթի
Արթին:Արթին
Արթուն:Արթուն
Արթուր:Արթուր
Արթօ:Արթօ
Արի:Արի
Արիայր:Արիայր
Արիս:Արիս
Արիստակ:Արիստակ
Արիստակէս:Արիստակէս
Արծրուն:Արծրուն
Արծրունի:Արծրունի
Արծւիկ:Արծւիկ
Արկադի:Արկադի
Արմանդ:Արմանդ
Արմաւիր:Արմաւիր
Արմենակ:Արմենակ
Արմէն:Արմէն
Արմին:Արմին
Արմոգ:Արմոգ
Արմոնդ:Արմոնդ
Արմօ:Արմօ
Արշակ:Արշակ
Արշամ:Արշամ
Արշաւի:Արշաւի
Արշաւիլ:Արշաւիլ
Արշաւիր:Արշաւիր
Արշէն:Արշէն
Արութ:Արութ
Արութին:Արութին
Արութիւն:Արութիւն
Արուշատ:Արուշատ
Արսէն:Արսէն
Արտակ:Արտակ
Արտաշ:Արտաշ
Արտաշէս:Արտաշէս
Արտաշիր:Արտաշիր
Արտաւազդ:Արտաւազդ
Արտաւան:Արտաւան
Արտէն:Արտէն
Արտիթ:Արտիթ
Արտօ:Արտօ
Արւին:Արւին
Արփակ:Արփակ
Արփիար:Արփիար
Արքա:Արքա
Աւագ:Աւագ
Աւագիկ:Աւագիկ
Աւագիմ:Աւագիմ
Աւան:Աւան
Աւանէս:Աւանէս
Աւետ:Աւետ
Աւետիս:Աւետիս
Աւետիք:Աւետիք
Աւետում:Աւետում
Աւէ:Աւէ
Աւիկ:Աւիկ
Աւիս:Աւիս
Աւօ:Աւօ
Ափիկ:Ափիկ
Աֆշին:Աֆշին
Բաբգէն:Բաբգէն
Բաբէլ:Բաբէլ
Բաբիկ:Բաբիկ
Բաբկէն:Բաբկէն
Բագամ:Բագամ
Բագարատ:Բագարատ
Բագրատ:Բագրատ
Բադի:Բադի
Բադրիկ:Բադրիկ
Բազա:Բազա
Բազէ:Բազէ
Բազիկ:Բազիկ
Բակուր:Բակուր
Բաղդասար:Բաղդասար
Բաղդօ:Բաղդօ
Բարգօ:Բարգօ
Բարթիկ:Բարթիկ
Բարթող:Բարթող
Բարթողիմէոս:Բարթողիմէոս
Բարթօ:Բարթօ
Բարունակ:Բարունակ
Բարսեղ:Բարսեղ
Բեգլար:Բեգլար
Բեթղեհեմ:Բեթղեհեմ
Բենա:Բենա
Բենիամին:Բենիամին
Բենիկ:Բենիկ
Բենօ:Բենօ
Բերդակ:Բերդակ
Բերդիկ:Բերդիկ
Բզնունի:Բզնունի
Բիւզանդ:Բիւզանդ
Բիւրատ:Բիւրատ
Բորիս:Բորիս
Գաբիկ:Գաբիկ
Գաբրիէլ:Գաբրիէլ
Գաբրօ:Գաբրօ
Գաբօ:Գաբօ
Գագիկ:Գագիկ
Գալէ:Գալէ
Գալի:Գալի
Գալոց:Գալոց
Գալուստ:Գալուստ
Գալստան:Գալստան
Գալօ:Գալօ
Գամառ:Գամառ
Գամեր:Գամեր
Գամիկ:Գամիկ
Գայլուկ:Գայլուկ
Գառնի:Գառնի
Գառնիկ:Գառնիկ
Գառնուկ:Գառնուկ
Գառնօ:Գառնօ
Գառօ:Գառօ
Գասպար:Գասպար
Գասպիկ:Գասպիկ
Գասպօ:Գասպօ
Գարեգին:Գարեգին
Գարօ:Գարօ
Գեղակ:Գեղակ
Գեղամ:Գեղամ
Գեղայր:Գեղայր
Գեղաչ:Գեղաչ
Գեղարդ:Գեղարդ
Գերասիմ:Գերասիմ
Գեւի:Գեւի
Գեւիկ:Գեւիկ
Գեւորգ:Գեւորգ
Գեւորիկ:Գեւորիկ
Գեւօ:Գեւօ
Գէորգ:Գէորգ
Գէորգիկ:Գէորգիկ
Գէորգոս:Գէորգոս
Գինդ:Գինդ
Գինոս:Գինոս
Գիսակ:Գիսակ
Գիւտ:Գիւտ
Գիւտիկ:Գիւտիկ
Գիքոր:Գիքոր
Գիքօ:Գիքօ
Գլակ:Գլակ
Գղակ:Գղակ
Գնէլ:Գնէլ
Գնունի:Գնունի
Գոմեր:Գոմեր
Գոռ:Գոռ
Գոռակ:Գոռակ
Գորգ:Գորգ
Գորգիկ:Գորգիկ
Գորիս:Գորիս
Գուգարք:Գուգարք
Գուսան:Գուսան
Գուրգէն:Գուրգէն
Գուրիկ:Գուրիկ
Գրգօ:Գրգօ
Գրէ:Գրէ
Գրէգ:Գրէգ
Գրիգոր:Գրիգոր
Գրիգորիկ:Գրիգորիկ
Գրիգորիս:Գրիգորիս
Գրիշ:Գրիշ
Գրօ:Գրօ
Դանան:Դանան
Դանիէլ:Դանիէլ
Դանիկ:Դանիկ
Դասիկ:Դասիկ
Դարէ:Դարէ
Դարէհ:Դարէհ
Դաւթակ:Դաւթակ
Դաւթիկ:Դաւթիկ
Դաւիթ:Դաւիթ
Դաւօ:Դաւօ
Դենիկ:Դենիկ
Դեր:Դեր
Դերեն:Դերեն
Դերենիկ:Դերենիկ
Դերիկ:Դերիկ
Դոդիկ:Դոդիկ
Դուման:Դուման
Դուրան:Դուրան
Դրաստամատ:Դրաստամատ
Դրօ:Դրօ
Դւին:Դւին
Եդւարդ:Եդւարդ
Եզնիկ:Եզնիկ
Եզրաս:Եզրաս
Եղիազար:Եղիազար
Եղիշ:Եղիշ
Եղիշա:Եղիշա
Եղիշէ:Եղիշէ
Եղնազար:Եղնազար
Եղօ:Եղօ
Ենովք:Ենովք
Ենոք:Ենոք
Եսակ:Եսակ
Եսայի:Եսայի
Եսօ:Եսօ
Երամ:Երամ
Երանոս:Երանոս
Երեմ:Երեմ
Երեմիա:Երեմիա
Երեւան:Երեւան
Երեւում:Երեւում
Երմի:Երմի
Երւանդ:Երւանդ
Եփրեմ:Եփրեմ
Զատիկ:Զատիկ
Զարեհ:Զարեհ
Զարեւանդ:Զարեւանդ
Զարէհ:Զարէհ
Զարմայր:Զարմայր
Զարմօ:Զարմօ
Զաւէն:Զաւէն
Զաւիկ:Զաւիկ
Զաւրակ:Զաւրակ
Զաւրիկ:Զաւրիկ
Զաւրօ:Զաւրօ
Զաւօ:Զաւօ
Զաքար:Զաքար
Զաքարէ:Զաքարէ
Զաքարիա:Զաքարիա
Զաքէոս:Զաքէոս
Զաքի:Զաքի
Զաքօ:Զաքօ
Զգօն:Զգօն
Զեբեդոս:Զեբեդոս
Զեբօ:Զեբօ
Զենոբ:Զենոբ
Զէյթուն:Զէյթուն
Զոհրաբ:Զոհրաբ
Զօրայր:Զօրայր
Զօրի:Զօրի
Էդգար:Էդգար
Էդիկ:Էդիկ
Էդմոնդ:Էդմոնդ
Էդւարդ:Էդւարդ
Էդւին:Էդւին
Էդօ:Էդօ
Էլիազար:Էլիազար
Էմանուէլ:Էմանուէլ
Էմիլ:Էմիլ
Էմին:Էմին
Էջմին:Էջմին
Էրիկ:Էրիկ
Էրիմենա:Էրիմենա
Էրիք:Էրիք
Ընծայր:Ընծայր
Ընձակ:Ընձակ
Ընձեր:Ընձեր
Ընձուղ:Ընձուղ
Թագաւոր:Թագաւոր
Թագուր:Թագուր
Թադէ:Թադէ
Թադէոս:Թադէոս
Թադօ:Թադօ
Թաթա:Թաթա
Թաթիկ:Թաթիկ
Թաթուլ:Թաթուլ
Թաթօ:Թաթօ
Թահմազ:Թահմազ
Թամ:Թամ
Թամազ:Թամազ
Թամուր:Թամուր
Թամրազ:Թամրազ
Թարա:Թարա
Թելման:Թելման
Թեմուր:Թեմուր
Թեմրազ:Թեմրազ
Թեւան:Թեւան
Թեւոս:Թեւոս
Թէոդիկ:Թէոդիկ
Թէոդոս:Թէոդոս
Թէոդորիկ:Թէոդորիկ
Թէոդորոս:Թէոդորոս
Թէոս:Թէոս
Թիւնի:Թիւնի
Թոդիկ:Թոդիկ
Թոմա:Թոմա
Թոմիկ:Թոմիկ
Թոնդրակ:Թոնդրակ
Թոնդրիկ:Թոնդրիկ
Թոռնիկ:Թոռնիկ
Թովմա:Թովմա
Թովմաս:Թովմաս
Թորգոմ:Թորգոմ
Թորիկ:Թորիկ
Թորիս:Թորիս
Թորոս:Թորոս
Թորոսիկ:Թորոսիկ
Թորօ:Թորօ
Թուխայր:Թուխայր
Թումա:Թումա
Թուման:Թուման
Թումաս:Թումաս
Թումօ:Թումօ
Ժամայր:Ժամայր
Ժամհայր:Ժամհայր
Ժան:Ժան
Ժիլբերթ:Ժիլբերթ
Ժիրակ:Ժիրակ
Ժիրայր:Ժիրայր
Ժիրիկ:Ժիրիկ
Ժիրօ:Ժիրօ
Ժոզէֆ:Ժոզէֆ
Ժոռա:Ժոռա
Ժորժ:Ժորժ
Ժորժիկ:Ժորժիկ
Ժորիկ:Ժորիկ
Իշխան:Իշխան
Իսահակ:Իսահակ
Իսայի:Իսայի
Իսկանդար:Իսկանդար
Իսմայիլ:Իսմայիլ
Իսրայէլ:Իսրայէլ
Իսօ:Իսօ
Իւանէ:Իւանէ
Իւրա:Իւրա
Իւրի:Իւրի
Իւրիկ:Իւրիկ
Լազար:Լազար
Լազարիկ:Լազարիկ
Լալւար:Լալւար
Լաւօ:Լաւօ
Լեմւէլ:Լեմւէլ
Լեռան:Լեռան
Լեւիկ:Լեւիկ
Լեւոն:Լեւոն
Լեւոնիկ:Լեւոնիկ
Լեւուշ:Լեւուշ
Լէոնարդ:Լէոնարդ
Լէոնիդ:Լէոնիդ
Լէօ:Լէօ
Լիպարիտ:Լիպարիտ
Լորիս:Լորիս
Լուդւիգ:Լուդւիգ
Լուքա:Լուքա
Լուքաս:Լուքաս
Խադ:Խադ
Խաժակ:Խաժակ
Խաժիկ:Խաժիկ
Խաժօ:Խաժօ
Խաչատուր:Խաչատուր
Խաչեան:Խաչեան
Խաչենիկ:Խաչենիկ
Խաչեր:Խաչեր
Խաչերես:Խաչերես
Խաչի:Խաչի
Խաչիկ:Խաչիկ
Խաչուկ:Խաչուկ
Խաչում:Խաչում
Խաչքօ:Խաչքօ
Խաչօ:Խաչօ
Խեչան:Խեչան
Խեչում:Խեչում
Խեչօ:Խեչօ
Խնկօ:Խնկօ
Խոռ:Խոռ
Խոսրով:Խոսրով
Խոսրովիկ:Խոսրովիկ
Խորէն:Խորէն
Խրիստ:Խրիստ
Ծառուկ:Ծառուկ
Ծատուր:Ծատուր
Ծերուկ:Ծերուկ
Ծերուն:Ծերուն
Ծերունի:Ծերունի
Ծերօն:Ծերօն
Ծոթրին:Ծոթրին
Կայծակ:Կայծակ
Կարաննի:Կարաննի
Կարապետ:Կարապետ
Կարէն:Կարէն
Կարպիս:Կարպիս
Կարօ:Կարօ
Կիկօ:Կիկօ
Կիրակոս:Կիրակոս
Կիւրեղ:Կիւրեղ
Կիւրոս:Կիւրոս
Կոլիա:Կոլիա
Կոհակ:Կոհակ
Կոմիկ:Կոմիկ
Կոմիտաս:Կոմիտաս
Կոմս:Կոմս
Կոսի:Կոսի
Կոստան:Կոստան
Կոստանդ:Կոստանդ
Կոստանդին:Կոստանդին
Կոստի:Կոստի
Կոստիկ:Կոստիկ
Կորիւն:Կորիւն
Կտրիճ:Կտրիճ
Կրպէ:Կրպէ
Կրպօ:Կրպօ
Հաբոկ:Հաբոկ
Հախնազար:Հախնազար
Հախվերդի:Հախվերդի
Համազ:Համազ
Համազասպ:Համազասպ
Համբար:Համբար
Համբիկ:Համբիկ
Համբօ:Համբօ
Համիկ:Համիկ
Համլետ:Համլետ
Համլիկ:Համլիկ
Համօ:Համօ
Հայա:Հայա
Հայաս:Հայաս
# Հայաստան:Հայաստան # very infrequently a given name
Հայդուկ:Հայդուկ
Հայկ:Հայկ
Հայկազ:Հայկազ
Հայկազարմ:Հայկազարմ
Հայկազն:Հայկազն
Հայկակ:Հայկակ
Հայկասեր:Հայկասեր
Հայկարամ:Հայկարամ
Հայկօ:Հայկօ
Հայրապետ:Հայրապետ
Հայրի:Հայրի
Հայրիկ:Հայրիկ
Հայրօ:Հայրօ
Հայք:Հայք
Հանէս:Հանէս
Հանրի:Հանրի
Հարբիկ:Հարբիկ
Հարմա:Հարմա
Հարմիկ:Հարմիկ
Հարմին:Հարմին
Հարմօ:Հարմօ
Հարուն:Հարուն
Հարպիկ:Հարպիկ
Հարփիկ:Հարփիկ
Հեթում:Հեթում
Հենրի:Հենրի
Հենրիկ:Հենրիկ
Հենօ:Հենօ
Հեսու:Հեսու
Հերման:Հերման
Հերոս:Հերոս
Հմայեակ:Հմայեակ
Հոմեր:Հոմեր
Հովիկ:Հովիկ
Հրակ:Հրակ
Հրահատ:Հրահատ
Հրայր:Հրայր
Հրանդ:Հրանդ
Հրանտ:Հրանտ
Հրաչ:Հրաչ
Հրաչեա:Հրաչեա
Հրատ:Հրատ
Հրատն:Հրատն
Ձեռք:Ձեռք
Ձօն:Ձօն
Ձօնիկ:Ձօնիկ
Ղազար:Ղազար
Ղազարոս:Ղազարոս
Ղազի:Ղազի
Ղազիկ:Ղազիկ
Ղազօ:Ղազօ
Ղարէն:Ղարէն
Ղեւոնդ:Ղեւոնդ
Ղուկաս:Ղուկաս
Ճարտար:Ճարտար
Ճգնաւոր:Ճգնաւոր
Մադաթ:Մադաթ
Մազան:Մազան
Մաթեւոս:Մաթեւոս
Մաթէ:Մաթէ
Մաթէոս:Մաթէոս
Մաթիկ:Մաթիկ
Մաթիոս:Մաթիոս
Մաթիւ:Մաթիւ
Մաթոս:Մաթոս
Մաթօ:Մաթօ
Մալխաս:Մալխաս
Մակար:Մակար
Մահտեսի:Մահտեսի
Մամբրէ:Մամբրէ
Մամիկոն:Մամիկոն
Մայիլ:Մայիլ
Մայիս:Մայիս
Մայք:Մայք
Մայքէլ:Մայքէլ
Մանաս:Մանաս
Մանասէ:Մանասէ
Մանասէր:Մանասէր
Մանաւազ:Մանաւազ
Մանկասար:Մանկասար
Մանուէլ:Մանուէլ
Մանուկ:Մանուկ
Մանցօ:Մանցօ
Մանօ:Մանօ
Մաշտոց:Մաշտոց
Մատաթ:Մատաթ
Մատաթիա:Մատաթիա
Մատթէ:Մատթէ
Մատթէոս:Մատթէոս
Մատթոս:Մատթոս
Մարատ:Մարատ
Մարգար:Մարգար
Մարդիթ:Մարդիթ
Մարթին:Մարթին
Մարկոս:Մարկոս
Մարկօ:Մարկօ
Մարութա:Մարութա
Մարտի:Մարտի
Մարտիկ:Մարտիկ
Մարտին:Մարտին
Մարտիրոս:Մարտիրոս
Մարտուն:Մարտուն
Մարտօ:Մարտօ
Մարք:Մարք
Մարքս:Մարքս
Մացակ:Մացակ
Մացօ:Մացօ
Մելիք:Մելիք
Մելիքսեթ:Մելիքսեթ
Մելքիսեդէկ:Մելքիսեդէկ
Մելքիսեթեկ:Մելքիսեթեկ
Մելքոմ:Մելքոմ
Մելքոն:Մելքոն
Մելքօ:Մելքօ
Մեծայր:Մեծայր
Մեհեկի:Մեհեկի
Մեհրուժան:Մեհրուժան
Մենուա:Մենուա
Մենուաս:Մենուաս
Մեռոն:Մեռոն
Մեսրոպ:Մեսրոպ
Մերուժ:Մերուժ
Մերուժան:Մերուժան
Մէոս:Մէոս
Միխայիլ:Միխայիլ
Միկիչ:Միկիչ
Միհր:Միհր
Միհրան:Միհրան
Միհրդատ:Միհրդատ
Միհրէ:Միհրէ
Մինաս:Մինաս
Մինօ:Մինօ
Միշա:Միշա
Միշել:Միշել
Միշիկ:Միշիկ
Միսակ:Միսակ
Միսաք:Միսաք
Միրան:Միրան
Միրաք:Միրաք
Միրզա:Միրզա
Միրզօ:Միրզօ
Միրիկ:Միրիկ
Միրիջան:Միրիջան
Միրօ:Միրօ
Միւռոն:Միւռոն
Միքայէլ:Միքայէլ
Միքօ:Միքօ
Մլեհ:Մլեհ
Մխիթար:Մխիթար
Մխիթարիկ:Մխիթարիկ
Մխիկ:Մխիկ
Մխօ:Մխօ
Մկրտիչ:Մկրտիչ
Մկրտում:Մկրտում
Մկօ:Մկօ
Մհեր:Մհեր
Մնակ:Մնակ
Մնաց:Մնաց
Մնացական:Մնացական
Մոսէ:Մոսէ
Մոսէս:Մոսէս
Մոսի:Մոսի
Մոսիկ:Մոսիկ
Մովսէս:Մովսէս
Մովսէսիկ:Մովսէսիկ
Մորիս:Մորիս
Մուկուչ:Մուկուչ
Մուշեղ:Մուշեղ
Մուշէ:Մուշէ
Մուսէ:Մուսէ
Մուսէս:Մուսէս
Մուսի:Մուսի
Մուրադ:Մուրադ
Մուքայէլ:Մուքայէլ
Մուքէլ:Մուքէլ
Մօրիկ:Մօրիկ
Յաբեթ:Յաբեթ
Յակոբ:Յակոբ
Յակոբիկ:Յակոբիկ
Յակովբ:Յակովբ
Յակօ:Յակօ
Յանէս:Յանէս
Յարութ:Յարութ
Յարութիւն:Յարութիւն
Յարօ:Յարօ
Յաւան:Յաւան
Յեսու:Յեսու
Յոբ:Յոբ
Յովակ:Յովակ
Յովակիմ:Յովակիմ
Յովանակ:Յովանակ
Յովանիկ:Յովանիկ
Յովաննէս:Յովաննէս
Յովասափ:Յովասափ
Յովել:Յովել
Յովէլ:Յովէլ
Յովիկ:Յովիկ
Յովհան:Յովհան
Յովհանէս:Յովհանէս
Յովհանիկ:Յովհանիկ
Յովհանիսիկ:Յովհանիսիկ
Յովհաննէս:Յովհաննէս
Յովհաննիկ:Յովհաննիկ
Յովնաթան:Յովնաթան
Յովնան:Յովնան
Յովսէփ:Յովսէփ
Յովօ:Յովօ
Յունան:Յունան
Յունօ:Յունօ
Յուսակ:Յուսակ
Յուսեր:Յուսեր
Յուսէփ:Յուսէփ
Յուսիկ:Յուսիկ
Յուստիանէ:Յուստիանէ
Յուստիկ:Յուստիկ
Նադիր:Նադիր
Նազար:Նազար
Նազարէթ:Նազարէթ
Նահապետ:Նահապետ
Նատօ:Նատօ
Նար:Նար
Նարբէյ:Նարբէյ
Նարբիկ:Նարբիկ
Նարդոս:Նարդոս
Նարեկ:Նարեկ
Նարիկ:Նարիկ
Նարիման:Նարիման
Նաւասարդ:Նաւասարդ
Ներսեհ:Ներսեհ
Ներսես:Ներսես
Ներսէս:Ներսէս
Ներսիկ:Ներսիկ
Ներսօ:Ներսօ
Նժդեհ:Նժդեհ
Նժդիկ:Նժդիկ
Նիկալ:Նիկալ
Նիկոլ:Նիկոլ
Նիկողայիս:Նիկողայիս
Նիկողայոս:Նիկողայոս
Նիկողոս:Նիկողոս
Նիկօ:Նիկօ
Նոբար:Նոբար
Նոյ:Նոյ
Նոյէլ:Նոյէլ
Նոյիկ:Նոյիկ
Նովա:Նովա
Նորաբերդ:Նորաբերդ
Նորազ:Նորազ
Նորազն:Նորազն
Նորակ:Նորակ
Նորայր:Նորայր
Նորապետ:Նորապետ
Նորբէկ:Նորբէկ
Նորեկ:Նորեկ
Նորէ:Նորէ
Նորէս:Նորէս
Նորի:Նորի
Նորիկ:Նորիկ
Նորին:Նորին
Նորհատ:Նորհատ
Նորման:Նորման
Նորմանուկ:Նորմանուկ
Նորվան:Նորվան
Նորվիկ:Նորվիկ
Շահազիզ:Շահազիզ
Շահակ:Շահակ
Շահամիր:Շահամիր
Շահան:Շահան
Շահբազ:Շահբազ
Շահեր:Շահեր
Շահէ:Շահէ
Շահէն:Շահէն
Շահիկ:Շահիկ
Շահնազար:Շահնազար
Շահնուր:Շահնուր
Շահոյ:Շահոյ
Շահում:Շահում
Շահվերդի:Շահվերդի
Շամբաթ:Շամբաթ
Շամիր:Շամիր
Շանթ:Շանթ
Շանթիկ:Շանթիկ
Շանթօ:Շանթօ
Շապին:Շապին
Շատարեւ:Շատարեւ
Շարա:Շարա
Շաւասպ:Շաւասպ
Շաւարշ:Շաւարշ
Շաւրօ:Շաւրօ
Շերամ:Շերամ
Շերան:Շերան
